Utah statutes.
11-36a-302.   Impact fee facilities plan requirements -- Limitations -- School district or charter school.

(1)  An impact fee facilities plan shall identify:

(a)  demands placed upon existing public facilities by new development activity; and

(b)  the proposed means by which the local political subdivision will meet those demands.

(2)  In preparing an impact fee facilities plan, each local political subdivision shall generally consider all revenue sources, including impact fees and anticipated dedication of system improvements, to finance the impacts on system improvements.

(3)  A local political subdivision or private entity may only impose impact fees on development activities when the local political subdivision's or private entity's plan for financing system improvements establishes that impact fees are necessary to achieve an equitable allocation to the costs borne in the past and to be borne in the future, in comparison to the benefits already received and yet to be received.

(4) (a)  Subject to Subsection (4)(c), the impact fee facilities plan shall include a public facility for which an impact fee may be charged or required for a school district or charter school if the local political subdivision is aware of the planned location of the school district facility or charter school:

(i)  through the planning process; or

(ii)  after receiving a written request from a school district or charter school that the public facility be included in the impact fee facilities plan.

(b)  If necessary, a local political subdivision or private entity shall amend the impact fee facilities plan to reflect a public facility described in Subsection (4)(a).

(c) (i)  In accordance with Subsections 10-9a-305(4) and 17-27a-305(4), a local political subdivision may not require a school district or charter school to participate in the cost of any roadway or sidewalk.

(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(c)(i), if a school district or charter school agrees to build a roadway or sidewalk, the roadway or sidewalk shall be included in the impact fee facilities plan if the local jurisdiction has an impact fee facilities plan for roads and sidewalks.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

